Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6793YH (10) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2722 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.39F Indoor mold public 1 information and awareness program. 2 1. As used in this section, âindoor moldâ means any form of 3 multicellular fungi, including but not limited to cladosporium, 4 penicillium, alternaria, aspergillus, fusarium, trichoderma, 5 memnoniella, mucor, and stachybotrys chartarum, found in damp 6 or water-damaged indoor environments and building materials. 7 2. The department shall establish an indoor mold public 8 information and awareness program to assist the public in 9 understanding the threat of indoor mold found in indoor 10 environments and the importance of the proper removal of indoor 11 mold. As part of the program, the department shall do all of 12 the following: 13 a. Beginning July 1, 2026, review the adverse effects 14 to humans from exposure to indoor mold found in damp and 15 water-damaged indoor environments. In reviewing the adverse 16 effects, the department shall consult with medical research 17 institutions and organizations with expertise in the adverse 18 effects of such exposure. The department shall submit a report 19 that contains the departmentâs findings and recommendations to 20 the general assembly by June 30, 2027. 21 b. Every five years, beginning July 1, 2027, review 22 technology or treatment techniques for indoor mold 23 identification and remediation that provide additional 24 protections to public health and safety. The review performed 25 shall include an examination of any new scientific evidence 26 that indicates that indoor mold may present a greater health 27 risk to the public than previously determined. The department 28 shall submit a report to the general assembly following 29 completion of each review, including the findings of and 30 recommendations for additional protections for the public 31 health and safety based on the review. 32 c. Establish a public information and awareness campaign 33 on the dangers of indoor mold and damp or water-damaged 34 indoor environments. The campaign shall educate the public on 35 -1- LSB 6793YH (10) 91 ak/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2722 the health effects of indoor mold in damp and water-damaged 1 buildings and building materials, and on the methods of 2 identifying and remediating indoor mold, and shall provide 3 contact information for organizations or government agencies 4 that assist the public with indoor mold concerns. 5 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 6 17A, including rules that provide for the requirements and 7 procedures for the five-year review and the parameters for the 8 public information and awareness campaign, and any other rules 9 necessary to administer this section. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135.39G Mold remediation ââ standard 11 of care. 12 All mold remediation performed in the state must be 13 conducted in accordance to the most recent edition of 14 ANSI/IICRC S520 standard for professional mold remediation, 15 or its successor publication, or any other equivalent 16 ANSI-accredited mold remediation standard approved by the 17 department. 18